Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.030

Restrictions on civil jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction covered by RCW 3.66.020 shall not extend to the following civil actions:

(1) Actions involving title to real property;

(2) Actions for the foreclosure of a mortgage or enforcement of a lien on real estate;

(3) Actions for false imprisonment, libel, slander, malicious prosecution, criminal conversation, or seduction; and

(4) Actions against an executor or administrator as such.

[ 1961 c 299 s 114.]